Missouri, session 2026, HB1696.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 194.119, RSMo, and section 210.1700 as truly agreed to and
finally passed in conference committee substitute for senate substitute for senate bill no.
1421, one hundred third general assembly, second regular session, are repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 194.119 and 210.1700, to read as
follows:
194.119. 1. As used in this section, the term "right of sepulcher" means the right to
choose and control the burial, cremation, or other final disposition of a dead human body.
2. For purposes of this chapter and chapters 193, 333, and 436, and in all cases
relating to the custody, control, and disposition of deceased human remains, including the
common law right of sepulcher, where not otherwise defined, the term "next-of-kin" means
the following persons in the priority listed if such person is eighteen years of age or older, is
mentally competent, and is willing to assume responsibility for the costs of disposition:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

SS SCS HCS HB 1696 2
(1) An attorney in fact designated in a durable power of attorney wherein the
deceased specifically granted the right of sepulcher over his or her body to such attorney in
fact;
(2) For a decedent who was on active duty in the United States military at the time of
death, the person designated by such decedent in the written instrument known as the United
States Department of Defense Form 93, Record of Emergency Data, in accordance with 10
U.S.C. Section 1482;
(3) The surviving spouse, unless an action for the dissolution of the marriage has been
filed and is pending in a court of competent jurisdiction;
(4) Any surviving child of the deceased. If a surviving child is less than eighteen
years of age and has a legal or natural guardian, such child shall not be disqualified on the
basis of the child's age and such child's legal or natural guardian, if any, shall be entitled to
serve in the place of the child unless such child's legal or natural guardian was subject to an
action in dissolution from the deceased. In such event the person or persons who may serve
as next-of-kin shall serve in the order provided in subdivisions (5) to (9) of this subsection;
(5) (a) If the deceased is not a minor, any surviving parent of the deceased; or
(b) If the deceased is a minor with a court-appointed guardian, the court-
appointed guardian at the time of the minor's death if the court specifically granted the
right of sepulcher to the guardian unless the guardianship has been terminated under
section 475.083, not including subdivision (5) of subsection 1 of section 475.083;
(c) If the deceased is a minor without a court-appointed guardian who was
granted the right of sepulcher, a surviving parent who has custody of the minor; or
[(c)] (d) If the deceased is a minor without a court-appointed guardian who was
granted the right of sepulcher and the deceased's parents have joint custody, the parent
whose residence is the minor child's residence for purposes of mailing and education;
(6) Any surviving sibling of the deceased;
(7) The next nearest surviving relative of the deceased by consanguinity or affinity;
(8) Any person or friend who assumes financial responsibility for the disposition of
the deceased's remains if no next-of-kin assumes such responsibility;
(9) The county coroner or medical examiner; provided however that such assumption
of responsibility shall not make the coroner, medical examiner, the county, or the state
financially responsible for the cost of disposition.
3. The next-of-kin of the deceased shall be entitled to control the final disposition of
the remains of any dead human being consistent with all applicable laws, including all
applicable health codes. The next-of-kin may delegate the control of the final disposition of
the remains of any dead human being to an agent through either a specific or general grant of
power in accordance with section 404.710 if, at the time of delegation, the next-of-kin was

SS SCS HCS HB 1696 3
eighteen years of age or older and mentally competent and the principal or agent is taking
financial responsibility for the disposition.
4. A funeral director or establishment is entitled to rely on and act according to the
lawful instructions of any person claiming to be the next-of-kin of the deceased; provided
however, in any civil cause of action against a funeral director or establishment licensed
pursuant to this chapter for actions taken regarding the funeral arrangements for a deceased
person in the director's or establishment's care, the relative fault, if any, of such funeral
director or establishment may be reduced if such actions are taken in reliance upon a person's
claim to be the deceased person's next-of-kin.
5. Any person who desires to exercise the right of sepulcher and who has knowledge
of an individual or individuals with a superior right to control disposition shall notify such
individual or individuals prior to making final arrangements.
6. If an individual with a superior claim is notified in person or by written notice with
delivery confirmation to such person's last known address by a person with an inferior claim
that such person desires to exercise the right of sepulcher and the individual so served does
not object within forty-eight hours of such notice, such individual shall be deemed to have
waived such right. An individual with a superior right may also waive such right at any time
if such waiver is in writing and dated.
7. If there is more than one person in a class who are equal in priority and the funeral
director has no knowledge of any objection by other members of such class, the funeral
director or establishment shall be entitled to rely on and act according to the instructions of
the first such person in the class to make arrangements; provided that such person assumes
responsibility for the costs of disposition and no other person in such class provides written
notice of his or her objection. If the funeral director has knowledge that there is more than
one person in a class who are equal in priority and who do not agree on the disposition, the
decision of the majority of the members of such class shall control the disposition.
8. For purposes of conducting a majority vote under subsection 7 of this section, the
funeral director shall allow voting by proxy using a written authorization or instrument.
9. Religious, cultural, family, and individual beliefs of the deceased person shall
be considered by the next of kin when disposing of any human remains.
[210.1700. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Overnight camp", a program operated by a person or
organization that includes the hours between 9:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m. but
not for two or more sequential overnights;
(2) "Residential camp", a program operated by a person or
organization that includes the hours between 9:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m. for
two or more sequential overnights.

SS SCS HCS HB 1696 4
2. Each overnight camp or residential camp staff member or
volunteer who is eighteen years of age or older shall have received a
qualifying criminal background check as defined in 210.1080.]
210.1700. 1. As used in this section, "residential camp" means a program
operated by a person or organization that includes the hours between 9:00 p.m. and 6:00
a.m. for two or more sequential overnights.
2. Each residential camp staff member or volunteer who is eighteen years of age
or older shall be subject to a criminal background check prior to commencing
employment or volunteer service. Such criminal background check shall include:
(1) A search of the National Crime Information Center's National Sex Offender
Registry; and
(2) A search of the following data sources in Missouri and each state where such
staff member or volunteer has resided during the preceding five years, where such data
sources are available:
(a) The state name-based criminal registry or repository; and
(b) The state name-based sex offender registry or repository.
3. Upon completion of the background check, any staff member or volunteer
who is eighteen years of age or older shall be ineligible for employment or service if such
person:
(1) Is registered, or is required to be registered, on a state sex offender registry
or repository or the National Sex Offender Registry; or
(2) Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of any of the
offenses listed in paragraphs (a) to (k) of subdivision (5) of subsection 4 of section
210.1080 or any similar offense in any federal, state, municipal, or other court of similar
jurisdiction of which the camp has knowledge.
Section B. In the event that any section, provision, clause, phrase, or word of this act
or the application thereof is declared invalid under the Constitution of the United States or the
Constitution of the State of Missouri, whether on procedural or substantive grounds, it is the
intent of the general assembly that the remaining sections of this act remain in force and effect
as far as they are capable of being carried into execution as intended by the general assembly.
The general assembly hereby declares that it would have passed each section, provision,
clause, phrase, or word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more sections,
provisions, clauses, phrases, or words of this act or the application of this act would be
declared unenforceable, unconstitutional, or invalid.
✔